Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
802E

COURT
ADVISEMENT OF ALIENS ENTERING GUILTY PLEA

Section

802E-1 Legislative findings and intent

802E-2 Court advisement concerning alien status
required

prior to the commencement of trial, entry
of a plea of

guilty or nolo contendere, or admission of
guilt or

sufficient facts

802E-3 Failure to advise; vacation of judgment

802E-4 Court advisement concerning alien status
required at

the commencement of arraignment and plea
hearing

Case Notes

No abuse of discretion where court refused to apply
provisions of chapter retroactively to defendant's prior conviction. 81 H.
279, 916 P.2d 689 (1996).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next